el: Μηχανισμός εκτόξευσης: Αυτόματο ηλεκτρικό (AEG); Ηλεκτρικό blowback (EBB); Αερίου (pump action); Αερίου (με εξαγωγή κάλυκα); Αερίου blowback (GBB); Υβριδικό; Ελατηρίου (bolt action); Ελατηρίου (χειροκίνητο); Ελατηρίου (με εξαγωγή κάλυκα); Άλλο
ro-RO: Mecanismul blasterului: Electrică automată (AEG); Electrică cu blowback (EBB); Pe gaz (cu pompă); Pe gaz (cu ejectare tub); Pe gaz cu blowback (GBB); Hibrid; Cu arc (bolt action); Cu arc (manuală); Cu arc (cu ejectare tub); Altele
sl-SI: Mehanizem orodja za peskanje: Avtomatski električni (AEG); Električni blowback (EBB); Plinski (potezni - pump action); Plinski (izmet tulcev); Plinski blowback (GBB); Hibridni; Na vzmet (repetirni); Na vzmet (ročni); Na vzmet (izmet tulcev); Drugo
vi: Cơ chế hoạt động của súng bắn gel: Điện tự động (AEG); Điện blowback (EBB); Gas (bơm tay); Gas (văng vỏ đạn); Gas blowback (GBB); Lai; Lò xo (lên đạn từng viên); Lò xo (thủ công); Lò xo (văng vỏ đạn); Khác
bg-BG: Механизъм на бластера: Автоматично електрическо (AEG); Електрическо с откат (EBB); Газово (помпово действие); Газово (с изхвърляне на гилза); Газово с откат (GBB); Хибридно; Пружинно (болтово действие); Пружинно (ръчно); Пружинно (с изхвърляне на гилза); Други
sk-SK: Mechanizmus pištole: Automatický elektrický (AEG); Elektrický blowback (EBB); Plynový (pumpovací mechanizmus); Plynový (s vyhadzovaním nábojníc); Plynový blowback (GBB); Hybridný; Pružinový (odsuvný záver); Pružinový (manuálny); Pružinový (s vyhadzovaním nábojníc); Iný
hr-HR: Mehanizam za blaster: Automatski električni (AEG); Električni trzaj (EBB); Plinski (potezni); Plinski (s izbacivanjem čahura); Plinski trzaj (GBB); Hibridni; Na oprugu (repetirajući); Na oprugu (ručni); Na oprugu (s izbacivanjem čahura); Ostalo
en: Blaster mechanism: Automatic electric (AEG); Electric blowback (EBB); Gas (pump action); Gas (shell ejecting); Gas blowback (GBB); Hybrid; Spring (bolt action); Spring (manual); Spring (shell ejecting); Other
nb: Blastermekanisme: Automatisk elektrisk (AEG); Elektrisk blowback (EBB); Gass (pump action); Gass (hylseutkaster); Gassblowback (GBB); Hybrid; Fjær (bolt action); Fjær (manuell); Fjær (hylseutkaster); Annet
es: Mecanismo de funcionamiento del lanzador: Automático eléctrico (AEG); Blowback eléctrico (EBB); Gas (acción de bombeo); Gas (expulsión de cartuchos); Blowback de gas (GBB); Híbrido; Muelle (acción de cerrojo); Muelle (manual); Muelle (expulsión de cartuchos); Otro
ko: 블래스터 메커니즘: 자동 전동식(AEG); 전동식 블로우백(EBB); 가스식(펌프 액션); 가스식(탄피 배출); 가스식 블로우백(GBB); 하이브리드; 스프링식(볼트 액션); 스프링식(수동); 스프링식(탄피 배출); 기타
hu: Játékfegyver mechanizmusa: Automata elektromos (AEG); Elektromos szánhátrasiklásos (EBB); Gázos (pumpás); Gázos (hüvelykivető); Gázos szánhátrasiklásos (GBB); Hibrid; Rugós (forgó-tolózáras); Rugós (manuális); Rugós (hüvelykivető); Egyéb
zh-TW: 發射器機制: 電動全自動 (AEG); 電動覆進 (EBB); 瓦斯 (泵動式); 氣動 (拋殼); 瓦斯覆進 (GBB); 混合; 彈簧 (栓動); 彈簧 (手動); 彈簧 (拋殼); 其他
sv: Blaster-mekanism: Automatisk elektrisk (AEG); Elektrisk blowback (EBB); Gas (pumprepeter); Gas (hylsutkastning); Gas blowback (GBB); Hybrid; Fjäder (cylinderrepeter); Fjäder (manuell); Fjäder (hylsutkastning); Övrigt
ja: ブラスターメカニズム: オートマチック電動 (AEG); 電動ブローバック (EBB); ガス (ポンプアクション); ガス (排莢式); ガスブローバック (GBB); ハイブリッド; スプリング (ボルトアクション); スプリング (手動); スプリング (排莢式); その他
pl: Mechanizm blastera: Automatyczny elektryczny (AEG); Elektryczny blowback (EBB); Gazowy (zamek pompowy); Gazowy (wyrzut łusek); Gazowy blowback (GBB); Hybrydowy; Sprężynowy (zamek czterotaktowy); Sprężynowy (ręczny); Sprężynowy (wyrzut łusek); Inny
ru: Механизм бластера: Автоматический электрический (AEG); Электрический с имитацией отдачи (EBB); Газовый (помповый); Газовый (с выбросом гильз); Газовый с имитацией отдачи (GBB); Гибридный; Пружинный (продольно-скользящий затвор); Пружинный (ручной); Пружинный (с выбросом гильз); Другое
lt-LT: Šaudymo mechanizmas: Automatinis elektrinis (AEG); Elektrinis su atatranka (EBB); Dujinis (pompinis); Dujinis (su tūtelių išmetimu); Dujinis su atatranka (GBB); Hibridinis; Spyruoklinis (su spyna); Spyruoklinis (rankinis); Spyruoklinis (su tūtelių išmetimu); Kita
th: กลไกของปืนเจล: ไฟฟ้าอัตโนมัติ (AEG); ไฟฟ้าโบลว์แบ็ก (EBB); แก๊ส (ชักปั๊ม); แก๊ส (คัดปลอก); แก๊สโบลว์แบ็ก (GBB); ไฮบริด; สปริง (สลักดึง); สปริง (แมนนวล); สปริง (คัดปลอก); อื่นๆ
fr: Mécanisme du blaster: Électrique automatique (AEG); Électrique blowback (EBB); Gaz (à pompe); Gaz (à éjection de cartouche); Gaz blowback (GBB); Hybride; À ressort (à verrou); À ressort (manuel); À ressort (à éjection de cartouche); Autre
cs: Mechanismus blasteru: Automatický elektrický (AEG); Elektrický BlowBack (EBB); Plynový (pumpovací); Plynový (s vyhazováním patron); Plynový BlowBack (GBB); Hybridní; Manuální (opakovací); Manuální (pružinový); Manuální (s vyhazováním patron); Jiné
fi: Blasterin toimintamekanismi: Automaattinen sähkötoiminen (AEG); Sähköinen blowback (EBB); Kaasu (pumpputoiminen); Kaasu (hylsyjä poistava); Kaasutoiminen blowback (GBB); Hybridi; Jousi (pulttilukkoinen); Jousi (manuaalinen); Jousi (hylsyjä poistava); Muu
pt-PT: Mecanismo de disparo: Elétrica automática (AEG); Blowback elétrica (EBB); A gás (ação de bomba); A gás (ejeção de cartuchos); Blowback a gás (GBB); Híbrido; A mola (ação de ferrolho); A mola (manual); A mola (ejeção de cartuchos); Outros
da: Blastermekanisme: Automatisk elektrisk (AEG); Elektrisk blowback (EBB); Gas (pump-action); Gas (patronudkast); Gas-blowback (GBB); Hybrid; Fjeder (bolt-action); Fjeder (manuel); Fjeder (patronudkast); Andet
it: Meccanismo del blaster: Elettrico automatico (AEG); Elettrico scarrellante (EBB); A gas (a pompa); A gas (con espulsione bossoli); A gas scarrellante (GBB); Ibrido; A molla (bolt-action); A molla (manuale); A molla (con espulsione bossoli); Altro
zh-CN: 软弹枪机制: 电动自动 (AEG); 电动回膛 (EBB); 气动（泵动式）; 气动（抛壳式）; 气动回膛 (GBB); 混合; 弹簧（拉栓式）; 弹簧（手动）; 弹簧（抛壳式）; 其他
de: Blastermechanismus: Automatisch elektrisch (AEG); Elektrischer Blowback (EBB); Gas (Pump Action); Gas (Hülsenauswurf); Gas-Blowback (GBB); Hybrid; Federdruck (Repetierer); Federdruck (Manuell); Federdruck (Hülsenauswurf); Sonstige
tr: Blaster mekanizması: Otomatik elektrikli (AEG); Elektrikli geri tepme (EBB); Gazlı (pompalı); Gazlı (kovan fırlatan); Gazlı geri tepme (GBB); Hibrit; Yaylı (sürgülü); Yaylı (manuel); Yaylı (kovan fırlatan); Diğer
nl: Blaster mechanisme: Automatisch elektrisch (AEG); Electric blowback (EBB); Gas (pump-action); Gas (shell-ejecting); Gas blowback (GBB); Hybride; Veer (bolt-action); Veer (handmatig); Veer (shell-ejecting); Anders
pt-BR: Mecanismo de disparo: Elétrico automático (AEG); Blowback elétrico (EBB); Gás (pump action); Gás (ejeção de cápsulas); Blowback a gás (GBB); Híbrido; Mola (ação por ferrolho); Mola (manual); Mola (ejeção de cápsulas); Outro